Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1236
Department of Labor; post compliance and enforcement information.

No later than December 1 of each year, the Department of Labor shall post information on its website regarding compliance with and enforcement of the Nebraska Wage Payment and Collection Act and shall provide notice to the Legislature that the information was posted. The information shall include, but not be limited to, (1) the total number of reports of unpaid wages filed with the department in the prior calendar year, (2) the total number of reports investigated in the prior calendar year, (3) the results of all investigations completed in the prior calendar year, including, but not limited to, the number of cases in which wages were found to be owed to an employee, the number of cases in which the employer paid wages owed to the employee during the course of the investigation, and the number of cases in which it was found that no wages were owed to an employee, (4) the number of citations issued pursuant to section 48-1234 in the prior calendar year, (5) the total amount of wages owed to employees according to the citations issued in the prior calendar year, (6) the number of employers with more than two citations in the previous five years, and (7) the number and names of employers with at least one unpaid citation from the previous five years.

Laws 2020, LB1016, § 6.